dictsource/tn_rules
// maintainer: Sternly K Simon
// email:sternly_simon@yahoo.com
// setswana translation rules
// with support from Jonathan Duddington

//2-letter groupds that represent classes of setswana nouns
// mo, ba, mo, me, le, ma, se, di, lo, bo, go, fa, ko, mo

.group a
        a        a
    _C) a        a
     _) a     (C a
      a (_       a
      a (s       a:
        aa       a:

.group b
        b        b
        b        B

.group c
        c        k
        ch       tS

.group d
        d        d
        dh       D

.group e
        e        e
        ee       e:
     s) e        i

.group f
        f        f

.group g
        g        g
    _k) g        g x2
        gh       Q


.group h
        h        h
        hl       l#

.group i
        i        i
        ii       i:

.group j
        j        J

.group k
        k        k
        kh       x

.group l
        l        l

.group m
        m        m
     _) m        m-
        m (A     m
     K) m (@@    _|m
     K) m (C     m-
     K) m (b@@   _|m
     K) m (v@@   _|m
     K) m (w@@   _|m

.group n
        n        n
     _) n        n-
        n (A     n
        n (@@    n
        ny       n^
        n (ch    n^
        n (j     n^
        ng'      N
        n (k     N
     _) n (k     N-
     _) n (k@@   N-
        n (g     N
     _) n (g     N-
     _) n (g@@   N-

.group o
        o        o
        oo       o:

.group p
        p        p

.group q
        q        k

.group r
        r          r
        r          R
        r          R3
     A) r (A       R
     C) r (A       @-*
        rr         RR

.group s
        s        s
        sh       S
     s  (e       s-
    _t) se       si:

.group t
        t        t
        th       T
        tsen ts'e:n
        tlh      K
        tl       l#

.group u
        u        u
        uu       u:
    _d) u        u:

.group v
        v        v

.group w
        w        w

.group x
        x        ks

.group y
        y        j

.group z
        z        z

.group
        $        dola
        %        asilimia

        *        n^ota
    *)  * (*
        **
   **)  * (_     _::
